vi: Loại mắt kim: Lớn; Dài; Nhỏ; Tóc chẻ ngọn; Khác
da: Nåleøjetype: Stor; Lang; Lille; Splittet; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta ušesa igle: Velika; Dolga; Majhna; Za nizanje perl; Drugo
it: Tipo di cruna dell'ago: Large; Lungo; Small; Divisa; Altro
ja: ニードルアイタイプ: 大; ロング; 小; 枝毛; その他
ko: 바늘 구멍 유형: 라지; 롱; 스몰; 스플릿; 기타
ro-RO: Tipul ochiului acului: Mare; Lungă; Mică; Despicată; Altele
zh-TW: 針眼類型: 大; 長; 小; 分叉; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de olho da agulha: Grande; Longo; Pequena; Ponta dupla; Outro
ru: Тип игольного ушка: Большой; Длинный; Маленький; Разделенный; Другой
lt-LT: Adatos akutės tipas: Didelė; Ilga; Maža; Atvira; Kita
tr: İğne Göz Tipi: Büyük; Uzun; Küçük; Kırık; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de olho de agulha: Grande; Comprido; Pequeno; Quebradiço; Outro
pl: Typ ucha igły: Duży; Długie; Mała; Split; Inne
fr: Type de chas d’aiguille: Grande; Long; Petite; Fourchus; Autre
nb: Nåleøyetype: Stor; Lang; Liten; Splitt; Annet
fi: Neulansilmätyyppi: Suuri; Pitkä; Pieni; Kaksihaaraiset; Muu
nl: Naaldoogtype: Groot; Lang; Klein; Gespleten; Andere
zh-CN: 针眼类型: 大; 长; 小; 分叉; 其他
hr-HR: Vrsta iglene ušice: Velika; Duga; Mala; Podijeljena; Ostalo
de: Nadelöhrtyp: Groß; Lang; Klein; Splissig; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Тип ухо на игла: Голямо; Дълго; Малко; Разделено; Други
sk-SK: Typ oka ihly: Veľký; Dlhý; Malý; Split; Iné
en: Needle eye type: Large; Long; Small; Split; Other
th: ประเภทรูเข็ม: ใหญ่; ยาว; เล็ก; ผมแตกปลาย; อื่นๆ
sv: Typ av nålöga: Stor; Lång; Liten; Kluvet; Övrigt
es: Tipo de ojo de aguja: Grande; Largo; Pequeño; Dividido; Otros
hu: Tű fokának típusa: Nagy; Hosszú; Kicsi; Osztott; Egyéb
cs: Typ oka jehly: Velká; Dlouhé; Malá; Rozdělené; Jiné
el: Τύπος ματιού βελόνας: Μεγάλη; Μακρύ; Μικρός; ΔιαχωρισμένοΣπλιτ; Άλλο